South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S650.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 53, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-53-150. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, ivermectin tablets may be made available to the public for over-the-counter purchase in this State. No prescription order or consultation with a pharmacist or other healthcare professional shall be required for such purchase. (B) A pharmacist acting within the scope of this section is immune from any civil liability or disciplinary action from the practitioner's professional licensing board. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----